Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.050

Board's authority.

The board may:

(1) Employ administrative, clerical, and investigative staff as necessary to administer and enforce this chapter;

(2) Establish fees for applications, examinations, and renewals in accordance with chapter 18.43 RCW;

(3) Issue licenses to applicants who meet the requirements of this chapter; and

(4) Exercise rule-making authority to implement this section.

[ 2019 c 442 s 16; 2011 c 256 s 4; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 77; 1999 c 263 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.